Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.070

Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning—Referral to licensed health care provider.

(1) Except as necessary to provide emergency care of athletic injuries, an athletic trainer shall not provide treatment, rehabilitation, or reconditioning services to any person except as specified in guidelines established with a licensed health care provider who is licensed to perform the services provided in the guidelines.

(2) If there is no improvement in an athlete who has sustained an athletic injury within fifteen days of initiation of treatment, rehabilitation, or reconditioning, the athletic trainer must refer the athlete to a licensed health care provider that is appropriately licensed to assist the athlete.

(3) If an athletic injury requires treatment, rehabilitation, or reconditioning for more than forty-five days, the athletic trainer must consult with, or refer the athlete to a licensed health care provider. The athletic trainer shall document the action taken.

[ 2007 c 253 s 8.]